District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

34-2413.05

Nonprofit housing developments — Submission of willful false statements.

Repealed.

June 4, 1982, D.C. Law 4-112, § 8, 29 DCR 1687
repealed pursuant to § 305 of D.C. Law 11-111

History

1981 Ed., § 43-1522.4.

Prior Codifications

Repeal effective 90 days after meeting of Board: Section 305 of D.C. Law 11-111 repealed this section. However, § 601 of D.C. Law 11-111 provided that title III of the act shall apply 90 days after the initial meeting of the Board established by section 204 of the act.

Editor's Notes